Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.744

School employee eligibility during COVID-19 state of emergency.

(1) A school employee eligible as of February 29, 2020, for the employer contribution towards benefits offered by the school employees' benefits board shall maintain their eligibility for the employer contribution under the following circumstances directly related or in response to the governor's February 29, 2020, proclamation of a state of emergency existing in all counties in the state of Washington related to the novel coronavirus (COVID-19):

(a) During any school closures or changes in school operations for the school employee;

(b) While the school employee is quarantined or required to care for a family member, as defined by RCW 49.46.210(2), who is quarantined; and

(c) In order to take care of a child as defined by RCW 49.46.210(2), when the child's:

(i) School is closed;

(ii) Regular day care facility is closed; or

(iii) Regular child care provider is unable to provide services.

(2) Requirements in subsection (1) of this section expires when the governor's state of emergency related to the novel coronavirus (COVID-19) ends.

(3) When regular school operations resume, school employees shall continue to maintain their eligibility for the employer contribution for the remainder of the school year so long as their work schedule returns to the schedule in place before February 29, 2020, or, if there is a change in schedule, so long as the new schedule, had it been in effect at the start of the school year, would have resulted in the employee being anticipated to work the minimum hours to meet benefits eligibility.

(4) Quarantine, as used in subsection (1)(b) [of this section] includes only periods of isolation required by the federal government, a foreign national government, a state or local public health official, a health care provider, or an employer.

[ 2020 c 8 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 8: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 17, 2020]." [ 2020 c 8 s 6.]